Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.067

Shelter care—Case conference—Service agreement.

(1)(a) Following shelter care and no later than thirty days prior to fact-finding, the department shall convene a case conference as required in the shelter care order to develop and specify in a written service agreement the expectations of both the department and the parent regarding voluntary services for the parent.

(b) The case conference shall include the parent, counsel for the parent, caseworker, counsel for the state, guardian ad litem, counsel for the child, and any other person agreed upon by the parties. Once the shelter care order is entered, the department is not required to provide additional notice of the case conference to any participants in the case conference.

(c) The written service agreement expectations must correlate with the court's findings at the shelter care hearing. The written service agreement must set forth specific services to be provided to the parent.

(d) The case conference agreement must be agreed to and signed by the parties. The court shall not consider the content of the discussions at the case conference at the time of the fact-finding hearing for the purposes of establishing that the child is a dependent child, and the court shall not consider any documents or written materials presented at the case conference but not incorporated into the case conference agreement, unless the documents or written materials were prepared for purposes other than or as a result of the case conference and are otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence.

(2) At any other stage in a dependency proceeding, the department, upon the parent's request, shall convene a case conference.

(3) If a case conference is convened pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section and the parent is unable to participate in person due to incarceration, the parent must have the option to participate through the use of a teleconference or videoconference.

[ 2018 c 284 s 5; 2013 c 173 s 1; 2009 c 520 s 23; 2004 c 147 s 1; 2001 c 332 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 147: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 147 s 5.]